California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) If an enforcement agency is authorized or required to take an action by a state law or local ordinance and that action is not otherwise authorized or required by this part, Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000), or Part 6 (commencing with Section 45030), the enforcement agency, with regard to that action, is governed only by that local ordinance or state law, respectively, in exercising that authority or carrying out that requirement and is not governed by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 509, Sec. 3.   (AB 1398)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

43201.

After August 1, 1992, no enforcement agency shall be designated pursuant to this article unless the board determines that the agency fully complies with one or more of the certification types specified in Section 43200. No enforcement agency shall, after August 1, 1992, exercise the powers of an enforcement agency pursuant to this chapter unless the agency has been certified by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43202.

An enforcement agency may be designated by the local governing body and certified by the board to act to carry out this chapter within each jurisdiction. If an enforcement agency is not designated and certified, the board, in addition to its other powers and duties, shall be the enforcement agency within the jurisdiction, subject to the agreement required pursuant to Section 43212.1 or 43310.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 3.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43203.

The designation of the enforcement agency shall be made by any one of the following procedures:

(a) The board of supervisors of the county may designate the enforcement agency to carry out this chapter in the county. The designation is subject to the approval by a majority of the cities within the county which contain a majority of the population of the incorporated areas of the county, except in those counties which have only two cities, in which case the designation shall be subject to approval by the city which contains the majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county.

(b) The county and the cities within the county may enter into a joint exercise of powers agreement pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for the purpose of establishing an enforcement agency to carry out this chapter in the jurisdiction of the joint powers agency.

(c) A city council may, at any time, designate an enforcement agency to carry out this chapter in the city.

(d) The board of supervisors of the county may designate an enforcement agency to carry out this chapter in the unincorporated area of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43204.

No enforcement agency may exercise the powers and duties of an enforcement agency until the designation is approved by the board. After August 1, 1992, the board shall not approve a designation unless it finds that the designated enforcement agency is capable of fulfilling its responsibilities under the enforcement program and meets the certification requirements adopted by the board pursuant to Section 43200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1355, Sec. 29.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

43205.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if no enforcement agency is designated and certified, the board shall be the enforcement agency and shall assume all the powers and duties of an enforcement agency pursuant to this chapter, subject to the agreement required pursuant to Section 43212.1 or 43310.1. If the board is the enforcement agency and an enforcement agency is then designated and certified by the board, the board shall continue to act as the enforcement agency for the remainder of the fiscal year, with those responsibilities terminating as of June 30, unless otherwise specified by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if no enforcement agency is designated and certified for Stanislaus County or Santa Cruz County, the board shall be the enforcement agency, and shall assume all of the powers and duties of an enforcement agency for that county, but shall not be required to enter into the agreement required pursuant to Sections 43212.1 or 43310.1.

(c) The board and the enforcement agency shall not, at any time, impose duplicative fees or charges on the owner or operator of a solid waste facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 4.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43206.

A designation made pursuant to this article may be withdrawn in the same manner in which it was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43207.

No local governmental department or agency, or any employee thereof, which is the operating unit for a solid waste handling or disposal operation shall be the enforcement agency, or an employee thereof, for the types of solid waste handling or disposal operation it conducts unless authorized by the board to act in that capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 5.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43208.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 731 of the Code of Civil Procedure, no local governing body may enact, issue, enforce, suspend, revoke, or modify any ordinance, regulation, law, license, or permit relating to a facility that accepts both hazardous wastes and other solid wastes and which meets any of the criteria enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 25148 of the Health and Safety Code, and was operating as of May 1, 1981, pursuant to a valid solid waste facility permit, so as to prohibit or unreasonably regulate the operation of, or the disposal, treatment, or recovery of resources from solid wastes at any such facility. However, nothing in this section authorizes an operator of such a facility to violate any term or condition of a local land use or facility permit or any other provision of law not in conflict with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43209.

The enforcement agency, within its jurisdiction and consistent with its certification by the board, shall do all of the following:

(a) Enforce applicable provisions of this part, regulations adopted under this part, and terms and conditions of permits issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44001).

(b) Request enforcement by appropriate federal, state, and local agencies of their respective laws governing solid waste storage, handling, and disposal.

(c) File with the board, upon its request, information the board determines to be necessary.

(d) Develop, implement, and maintain inspection, enforcement, permitting, and training programs.

(e) (1) Establish and maintain an enforcement program consistent with regulations adopted by the board to implement this chapter, the standards adopted pursuant to this chapter, and the terms and conditions of permits issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44001).

(2) The enforcement agency may establish specific local standards for solid waste handling and disposal subject to approval by a majority vote of its local governing body, by resolution or ordinance, if those standards are incorporated into the enforcement program specified in paragraph (1) and are approved by the department.

(3) A standard established pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with this division and all regulations adopted by the board.

(f) Keep and maintain records of its inspection, enforcement, permitting, training, and regulatory programs, and of any other official action in accordance with regulations adopted by the board.

(g) (1) Consult, as appropriate, with the appropriate local health agency concerning all actions which involve health standards.

(2) The consultation required by this subdivision shall include affording the health agency adequate notice and opportunity to conduct and report the evaluation as it reasonably determines is appropriate.

(h) Establish
 and maintain an inspection program.

(1) The inspection program required by this subdivision shall be designed to determine whether any solid waste facility is operating under any of the following:

(A) The facility is operating without a permit.

(B) The facility is operating in violation of state minimum standards.

(C) The facility is operating in violation of the terms and conditions of its solid waste facilities permit.

(D) The facility may pose a significant threat to public health and safety or to the environment, based on any relevant information.

(2) The inspection program established pursuant to this subdivision shall
 also ensure frequent inspections of solid waste facilities that have an established pattern of noncompliance with this division, regulations adopted pursuant to this division, or the terms and conditions of a solid waste facilities permit. The inspection program may include public awareness activities, enforcement to prevent the illegal dumping of solid waste, and the abatement of the illegal dumping of solid waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 509, Sec. 4.   (AB 1398)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

43209.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if an enforcement agency receives a complaint, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41705 of the Health and Safety Code, from an air pollution control district or an air quality management district pertaining to an odor emanating from a compost facility under its jurisdiction, the enforcement agency shall, in consultation with the district, take appropriate enforcement actions pursuant to this part.

(b) On or before April 1, 1998, the board shall convene a working group consisting of enforcement agencies and air pollution control districts and air quality management districts to assist in the implementation of this section and Section 41705 of the Health and Safety Code. On or before April 1, 1999, the board and the working group shall develop recommendations on odor measurement and thresholds, complaint response procedures, and enforcement tools and take any other action necessary to ensure that enforcement agencies respond in a timely and effective manner to complaints of odors emanating from composting facilities. On or before January 1, 2000, the board shall implement the recommendations of the working group that the board determines to be appropriate.

(c) On or before April 1, 2003, the board shall adopt and submit to the Office of Administrative Law, pursuant to Section 11346.2 of the Government Code, regulations governing the operation of organic composting sites that include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Odor management and threshold levels.

(2) Complaint investigation and response procedures.

(3) Enforcement tools.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2003, unless the board adopts and submits regulations governing the operation of organic composting sites to the Office of Administrative Law pursuant to subdivision (c) on or prior to that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 424, Sec. 3.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative April 1, 2003, as provided in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

43210.

For those facilities that accept only hazardous wastes, or accept only low-level radioactive wastes, or facilities that accept only both, and to which Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 114960) of Part 9 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code applies, the board and the enforcement agency have no enforcement or regulatory authority. All enforcement activities for the facilities relative to the control of hazardous wastes shall be performed by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 25180) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, and all enforcement activities relative to the control of low-level radioactive waste shall be performed by the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 114960) of Part 9 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

43211.

(a) For those facilities that accept both hazardous wastes and other solid wastes, the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall exercise enforcement and regulatory powers relating to the control of the hazardous wastes at the facility pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code. The board and the enforcement agency shall, at solid waste disposal facilities, exercise enforcement and regulatory powers relating to the control of solid wastes and asbestos-containing waste, as provided in Section 44820.

(b) For purposes of this section, “asbestos containing waste” means waste that contains more than 1 percent by weight, of asbestos that is either friable or nonfriable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

43212.

(a) If the board is the enforcement agency, the board may impose fees to recover its costs of operation on the local governing body, a solid waste facility operator, or a solid waste enterprise that operates within the jurisdiction of the enforcement agency, and shall collect those fees in a manner determined by the board and developed in consultation with the local governing body. Any fees imposed pursuant to this section shall bear a direct relationship to the reasonable and necessary costs, as determined by the board, of providing for the efficient operation of the activities or programs for which the fee is imposed.

(b) If the board is the enforcement agency for a county and all of the cities within that county, the local governing body shall be the county board of supervisors for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 7.5.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43212.1.

If the board is the enforcement agency, the local governing body and the board shall enter into an agreement which shall identify the jurisdictional boundaries of the enforcement agency; address the powers and duties to be performed by the board as the enforcement agency, and identify an estimated workload and anticipated costs to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 8.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43213.

The enforcement agency may, upon a majority vote of its local governing body, prescribe, revise, and collect fees or other charges from each operator of a solid waste facility or from any person who conducts solid waste handling if the local governing body having ratesetting authority has approved rate adjustments to compensate the solid waste hauler or solid waste facility operator for the amount of the fee or charges imposed pursuant to this section. The fee or other charge shall be based on the weight, volume, or type of solid waste which is received or handled by any such operator or person or on any other appropriate basis or any combination of the foregoing. In no case shall the fee or other charge imposed by the enforcement agency under this section exceed the actual cost of the solid waste enforcement authorized under this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

43214.

(a) The board shall develop performance standards for evaluating certified local enforcement agencies and shall periodically review each certified enforcement agency and its implementation of the permit, inspection, and enforcement program. The board’s review shall include periodic inspections of solid waste facilities and disposal sites within the jurisdiction of each enforcement agency for the purpose of evaluating whether the enforcement agency is appropriately applying and enforcing state minimum standards within its jurisdiction.

(b) Following initial certification of an enforcement agency by the board, the board shall conduct a performance review of the enforcement agency every three years, or more frequently as determined by the board.

(c) In conducting performance reviews of enforcement agencies, the board shall, based on the performance standards developed pursuant to subdivision (a), determine whether each enforcement agency is in compliance with the requirements of this article and the regulations adopted to implement this article. If the board finds that an enforcement agency is not fulfilling its responsibilities pursuant to this article and if the board also finds that this lack of compliance has contributed to significant noncompliance with state minimum standards at solid waste facilities or disposal sites within the jurisdiction of the enforcement agency, the board shall withdraw its approval of designation pursuant to Sections 43215 and 43216. Notwithstanding Sections 43215 and 43216, if the board finds that conditions at solid waste facilities or disposal sites within the jurisdiction of the enforcement agency threaten public health and safety or the environment, the board shall, within 10 days of notifying the enforcement agency, become the enforcement agency until another enforcement agency is designated locally and certified by the board.

(d) The board shall find that an enforcement agency is not fulfilling its responsibilities pursuant to this article, and may take action as prescribed by subdivision (c), if the board, in conducting its performance review, makes one or more of the following findings with regard to compliance with this part and Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000):

(1) The enforcement agency has failed to exercise due diligence in the inspection of solid waste facilities and disposal sites.

(2) The enforcement agency has intentionally misrepresented the results of inspections.

(3) The enforcement agency has failed to prepare, or cause to be prepared, permits, permit revisions, or closure and postclosure maintenance plans.

(4) The enforcement agency has approved permits, permit revisions, or closure and postclosure maintenance plans that are not consistent with this part and Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000).

(5) The enforcement agency has failed to take appropriate enforcement actions.

(6) The enforcement agency has failed to comply with, or has taken actions that are inconsistent with, or that are not authorized by, this division or the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this division. However, nothing in this paragraph is intended to affect the authority of enforcement agencies pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 43209.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

43215.

(a) If the board, in conducting the inspection and performance review required pursuant to Section 43214 or this section, finds that the enforcement agency is not fulfilling one or more of its responsibilities, the board shall notify the enforcement agency of the particular reasons for finding that the enforcement agency is not fulfilling its responsibilities and of the board’s intention to withdraw its approval of the designation if, within a time to be specified in that notification, but in no event less than 30 days, the enforcement agency does not take the corrective action specified by the board.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations that establish a process for notice, public hearing, the admission of evidence, and final action by the board for partial or full withdrawal of the approval of designation pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 10.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43215.1.

The board may, upon the written request of an enforcement agency, provide legal counsel for purposes of compliance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 11.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43216.

If the board withdraws its approval of the designation of an enforcement agency, another enforcement agency shall be designated pursuant to Section 43203 within 90 days and approved by the board. If no designation is made within 90 days, the board shall become the enforcement agency within the jurisdiction of the former enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43216.5.

In addition to the procedures for board withdrawal of its approval of a local enforcement agency’s designation pursuant to Sections 43214, 43215, and 43216, the board may take any actions which are determined by the board to be necessary to ensure that local enforcement agencies fulfill their obligations under this chapter. To ensure that a local enforcement agency is appropriately fulfilling its obligations under this chapter and implementing regulations, the board may conduct more frequent inspections and evaluations within a local enforcement agency’s jurisdiction, establish a schedule and probationary period for improved performance by a local enforcement agency, assume partial responsibility for specified local enforcement agency duties, and implement any other measures which may be determined by the board to be necessary to improve local enforcement agency compliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 15.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43217.

The board shall provide ongoing training, technical assistance, and guidance to local enforcement agencies to assist in their decisionmaking processes. This assistance shall include, but is not limited to, providing all of the following:

(a) Technical studies and reports.

(b) Copies of innovative solid waste facility operation plans.

(c) Investigative findings and analyses of new solid waste management practices and procedures.

(d) A program for loaning technical and scientific equipment, to the extent that funds are available to the board to purchase that equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 16.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43218.

Each enforcement agency shall inspect each solid waste facility within its jurisdiction at least one time each month and shall file, within 30 days of the inspection, a written report in a format prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43219.

(a) The board may, at its discretion, conduct inspections and investigations of solid waste facilities in order to evaluate the local enforcement agency and to ensure that state minimum standards are met.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by Section 43220, the board, in conjunction with an inspection conducted by the local enforcement agency, shall conduct inspections of solid waste facilities within the jurisdiction of each local enforcement agency. The board shall inspect the types and number of solid waste facilities which are determined by the board to be necessary to adequately evaluate whether the local enforcement agency is ensuring compliance by solid waste facilities with state minimum standards. A written inspection report shall be prepared and submitted within 30 days of the inspection to the local enforcement agency.

(c) If the board identifies any significant violation of state minimum standards that were not identified and resolved through previous inspections by the local enforcement agency, the board shall take appropriate action as authorized by Sections 43215 and 43216.5.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section and Sections 43215 and 43216, if, as a result of a facility inspection conducted pursuant to subdivision (b), the board finds that conditions at a solid waste facility within the jurisdiction of a local enforcement agency threaten public health and safety or the environment, the board shall, within 10 days of notifying the local enforcement agency, become the enforcement agency until another local enforcement agency is designated locally and certified by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 17.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43220.

The board, in conjunction with an inspection conducted by the local enforcement agency, shall conduct at least one inspection every 18 months of each solid waste landfill and transformation facility in the state. A written inspection report shall be prepared and submitted within 30 days of the inspection to the local enforcement agency. If the board identifies any significant violation of state minimum standards that was not resolved through previous inspections by the local enforcement agency, the board shall take appropriate action as authorized by Sections 43215 and 43216.5 and subdivision (d) of Section 43219.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 18.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43222.

Any fees or charges imposed pursuant to this part by any enforcement agency shall bear a direct relationship to the reasonable and necessary cost, as determined by the enforcement agency, of providing the efficient operation of the activities or programs for which the fee is assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 12.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Local Enforcement Agency Grants [43230. - 43232.]

43230.

The board shall expend funds from the account, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the making of grants to local enforcement agencies to carry out the solid waste facilities permit and inspection program pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44001). The total amount of grants made by the board pursuant to this section shall not exceed, in any one fiscal year, one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 20.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43231.

The board shall adopt regulations for the implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 20.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43232.

All expenses which are incurred by the board in carrying out this article are payable solely from the account. No liability or obligation is imposed upon the state pursuant to this part, and the board shall not incur a liability or obligation beyond the extent to which money is provided in the account for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 20.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of the Board [43300. - 43310.1.]

43300.

The board, when acting in its capacity as an enforcement agency, may enforce all provisions of this division, and the regulations adopted thereto, for the protection of the environment and the public health and safety, and from nuisance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 21.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43300.5.

The enforcement policies of this division shall be applied equally and without distinction to publicly owned or operated, and to privately owned or operated, solid waste facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 732, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

43301.

The board shall coordinate action in solid waste handling and disposal with other federal, state, and local agencies and private persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43302.

The board may request enforcement by appropriate federal, state, and local agencies of their respective laws governing solid waste storage, handling, and disposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43303.

The board shall develop, implement, and maintain inspection, enforcement, and training programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43304.

The board shall adopt an enforcement program consisting of regulations necessary to implement this division and the standards adopted pursuant thereto. The enforcement program shall include a description for carrying out the permit and inspection program pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44001).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43305.

The board may, as it deems necessary, establish specific local standards for solid waste handling and disposal after consultation with the local governing body. However, the standards shall be consistent with this division and all regulations adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43306.

The board shall keep and maintain records of its inspection, enforcement, training, and regulatory programs and of any other official action in accordance with regulations adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43307.

The board shall consult with the appropriate local health agency concerning all actions which involve health standards. The consultation shall include granting the health agency adequate notice and opportunity to conduct and report any evaluation that it reasonably deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43308.

For those facilities that accept only hazardous wastes and to which Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code applies, or that accept only low-level radioactive wastes and to which Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 114960) of Part 9 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code applies, or for those facilities that accept both, the board shall have no enforcement or regulatory authority. Except as otherwise provided in Section 40052, all enforcement activities for those facilities relative to the control of hazardous wastes shall be performed by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 25180) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, and all enforcement activities for those facilities relative to low-level radioactive wastes shall be performed by the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 114960) of Part 9 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 343, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

43309.

The board may adopt regulations specifying the operations subject to the exception in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 40200. The regulations shall prohibit the storing of more than 90 cubic yards of waste in covered containers during any 72-hour period and the transfer of uncontainerized refuse from smaller refuse hauling motor vehicles to larger refuse transfer motor vehicles for transport to the point of ultimate disposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43310.

If the board becomes the enforcement agency, it may charge reasonable fees to the local governing body to recover operation costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43310.1.

(a) If the board becomes the enforcement agency, on or after January 1, 1995, the local governing body and the board shall enter into an agreement which shall identify the jurisdictional boundaries of the enforcement agency; address the powers and duties to be performed by the board as the enforcement agency, and identify an estimated workload and anticipated costs to the board. The agreement shall also identify the cost recovery procedures to be followed by the board pursuant to Section 43310.

(b) If, after a good faith effort by the board and the local governing body, no agreement is reached between the local governing body and the board within the 90-day period specified in Section 43216, or within 90 days after a local governing body notifies the board of its intent not to designate an enforcement agency pursuant to Section 43203, the board shall make the determinations specified in subdivision (a) that would have been the subject of the agreement.

(c) If the board becomes the enforcement agency for Stanislaus County or Santa Cruz County, the board shall impose fees authorized pursuant to this section directly on the solid waste facilities in those counties, and shall not require the local governing body to impose or collect those fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 13.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Closure Plans [43500. - 43510.]

43500.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the long-term protection of air, water, and land from pollution due to the disposal of solid waste is best achieved by requiring financial assurances of the closure and postclosure maintenance of solid waste landfills.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 603.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

43501.

(a) A person owning or operating a solid waste landfill, as defined in Section 40195.1, shall do both of the following:

(1) Upon application to become an operator of a solid waste facility pursuant to Section 44001, certify to the board and the local enforcement agency that all of the following have been accomplished:

(A) The owner or operator has prepared an initial estimate of closure and postclosure maintenance costs.

(i) The board shall adopt regulations that provide for an increase in the initial closure and postclosure maintenance cost estimates to account for cost overruns due to unforeseeable circumstances, and to provide a reasonable contingency comparable to that which is built into cost estimates for other, similar public works projects.

(ii) The board shall adopt regulations on or before January 1, 2008, that require closure and postclosure maintenance cost estimates to be based on reasonably foreseeable costs the state may incur if the state would have to assume responsibility for the closure and postclosure maintenance due to the failure of the owner or operator. Cost estimates shall include, but not be limited to, estimates in compliance with Sections 1770, 1773, and 1773.1 of the Labor Code, and the replacement and repair costs for longer lived items, including, but not limited to, repair of the environmental control systems.

(B) The owner or operator has established a trust fund or equivalent financial arrangement acceptable to the board, as specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 43600).

(C) The amounts that the owner or operator will deposit annually in the trust fund or equivalent financial arrangement acceptable to the board will ensure adequate resources for closure and postclosure maintenance.

(2) Submit to the regional water board, the local enforcement agency, and the board a plan for the closure of the solid waste landfill and a plan for the postclosure maintenance of the solid waste landfill.

(b) Notwithstanding subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or any other provision of law, if the owner or operator is a county with a population of 200,000 or less, as determined by the 1990 decennial census, the county shall not be required to make annual deposits in excess of the amount required by the federal act or any other applicable federal law, or by any board-approved formula that meets the requirements of the federal act.

(c) If not in conflict with federal law or regulations, a county or city may, with regard to a solid waste landfill owned or operated by the county or city, base its estimate of closure and postclosure maintenance costs on the costs of employing county or city employees or persons under contract with the county or city in performing closure and postclosure maintenance. However, even if, to meet federal requirements, the cost estimate is based on the most expensive costs of closure and postclosure maintenance performed by a third party, the county or city may, to effect cost savings, employ county or city employees or employ persons under contract to actually perform closure operations or postclosure maintenance operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

43501.5.

(a) In addition to the requirements of this article, and Section 21780 of Title 27 of the California Code of Regulations, a person who is required to file a final closure plan shall also file with the enforcement agency a Labor Transition Plan that includes all of the following:

(1) Provisions that ensure, subject to any requirements already established pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement, preferential reemployment and transfer rights of displaced employees to comparable available employment with the same employer for a period of no less than one year following the closure of the solid waste facility.

(2) Provisions to provide displaced employees assistance in finding comparable employment with other employers.

(3) Provisions to ensure compliance with all applicable provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of Part of 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(b) When submitting the final closure plan, the operator shall submit, in addition to the requirements of subdivision (a), a certification to the board and the enforcement agency that the provisions described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), will be implemented, subject to any requirements already established under a collective bargaining agreement.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “comparable employment” means the same or a substantially similar job classification at equal or greater wage and benefit levels in the same geographic region of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 823, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

43502.

All documentation relating to the preparation of the closure and postclosure maintenance costs shall be retained by the owner or operator and shall be available for inspection by the board or the enforcement agency at reasonable times.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43503.
